Utah statutes.
31A-37a-203.   Reporting related to transactions.
(1)  A special purpose financial captive insurance company shall provide the
commissioner with a copy of a complete set of executed documentation of an
insurance securitization no later than 30 days after the day on which the
insurance securitization transaction closes.
(2)  Section 31A-37-503 applies to:
(a)  information submitted pursuant to Subsection (1);
(b)  information submitted pursuant to Subsection 31A-37a-201(2); or
(c)  an order issued to a special purpose financial captive insurance company
pursuant to Subsection 31A-37a-201(4).
